Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
CERTIFIED IMPORTERS OF MICROORGANISMS

§150A-41 Microorganism import. (a)
Notwithstanding the permit requirements of sections 150A-5 and 150A-6.3, the
board may issue a certificate to an importer of microorganisms authorizing
import and possession of microorganisms on the list of restricted
microorganisms or unlisted microorganisms referenced in section 150A-6.3;
provided that:

(1) The import and possession is for medical or
scientific purposes;

(2) The microorganisms are contained in a laboratory
or other contained system approved by the department;

(3) The microorganisms are used in a manner that will
not be detrimental to agriculture, horticulture, the environment, animals, or
humans; and

(4) The importer is able to meet requirements established
by the board,

as further verified through site inspection by the
department.

(b) Import by a certified importer of
microorganisms other than those listed in the importer's certificate or for
uses other than specified for each type of microorganism listed in the
certificate shall be pursuant to section 150A-6.3.

(c) A certified importer importing pursuant to
certificate shall comply with the provisions of part II other than the permit
requirement, as applicable, in particular, the notification, labeling, and
inspection requirements of section 150A-5. [L 1999, c 177, pt of §1; am L 2000,
c 211, §11]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next